Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
ARTICLE 2
SOLID WASTE MANAGEMENT

Cross references.

- Regulation of facilities discharging pollutants into waters of state, T. 12, C. 5, A. 2.

Criminal penalties for littering public and private property, T. 16, C. 7, A. 2, P. 2 & 3.

Restrictions on location of and screening and fencing requirements for junkyards, T. 32, C. 6, A. 8.

Prohibition against transporting garbage, trash, waste, or refuse across state or county lines for dumping,

§

36-1-16

.

Authority of counties and municipalities to enter into contracts to provide industrial waste water treatment services,

§

36-60-2

.

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 1990, p. 412,

§

1, effective March 30, 1990, repealed the Code sections formerly codified at this article and enacted the current article. The former article consisted of Code Sections 12-8-20 through 12-8-45 and was based on Ga. L. 1972, p. 1002,

§§

1-20; Ga. L. 1973, p. 1269,

§§

1-7; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3,

§

12; Ga. L. 1988, p. 215,

§

1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1965,

§§

1-8; Ga. L. 1989, p. 144,

§§

1-7; Ga. L. 1989, p. 513,

§

1; and Ga. L. 1990, p. 8,

§

12.

Administrative Rules and Regulations.

- Solid waste management, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Natural Resources, Environmental Protection, Subject 391-3-4.

Law reviews.

-
For article discussing regulation of selected activities to effect environmental planning, see 10 Ga. L. Rev. 53 (1975). For article, "The Resource Conservation and Recovery Act (RCRA) and the Georgia Solid Waste Management Act," see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 569 (1987).
For note on 1990 enactment of this article, see 7 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (1990). For note on 1993 amendment of this article, see 10 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 46 (1993).